Utah statutes.
62A-1-112.   Participation in federal programs -- Federal grants -- Authority of executive director.

(1)  The executive director may, by following the procedures and requirements of Title 63J, Chapter 5, Federal Funds Procedures, seek federal grants, loans, or participation in federal programs.

(2)  Wherever state law authorizes a board, director, division, or office of the department to accept any grant, fund, or service which is to be advanced or contributed in whole or in part by the federal government, that acceptance shall be subject to the approval or disapproval of the executive director.  All applications for federal grants or other federal financial assistance for the support of any department program is subject to the approval of the executive director.

(3)  If any executive or legislative provision of the federal government so requires, as a condition to participation by this state in any fund, property, or service, the executive director, with the governor's approval, shall expend whatever funds are necessary out of the money provided by the Legislature for use and disbursement by that department.

